Florida, session 2026, SB128.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (5) of section 12 627.7011, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 13 627.7011âHomeownersâ policies; offer of replacement cost 14 coverage and law and ordinance coverage.â 15 (5) 16 (c)âFor a roof that is at least 15 years old, an insurer 17 must allow a homeowner to have a roof inspection performed by an 18 authorized inspector at the homeownerâs expense before requiring 19 the replacement of the roof of a residential structure as a 20 condition of issuing or renewing a homeownerâs insurance policy. 21 The insurer may not refuse to issue or refuse to renew a 22 homeownerâs insurance policy solely because of roof age if, 23 during an inspection of the roof of the residential structure, 24 the performed by an authorized inspector performing the 25 inspection determines indicates that the roof has 5 years or 26 more of useful life remaining. If an authorized inspector makes 27 such a determination, the insurer must reimburse the homeowner 28 for the cost of the inspection in an amount not to exceed $300. 29 An insurer must notify a homeowner of the right to have a roof 30 inspection and of the insurerâs obligation to reimburse the 31 homeowner as specified under this paragraph at the time of 32 issuing or renewing a homeownerâs insurance policy. 33 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.